Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1482
Lobbyists and principals; registration fees; disbursement.

The Clerk of the Legislature shall charge a fee pursuant to section 49-1480.01 for each application for registration by a lobbyist for each principal. Such fees when collected shall be remitted to the State Treasurer. One-half of such fees shall be credited to the Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission Cash Fund and one-half to the Clerk of the Legislature Cash Fund.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 82;

Laws 1977, LB 4, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 41;

Laws 1994, LB 872, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1243, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 32;

Laws 2024, LB1104, § 2.